Utah statutes.
62A-17-103.   Designated approved 211 service provider -- Department responsibilities.

(1)  The department shall designate an approved 211 service provider to provide information to Utah citizens about health and human services available in the citizen's community.

(2)  Only a service provider approved by the department may provide 211 telephone services in this state.

(3)  The department shall approve a 211 service provider after considering the following:

(a)  the ability of the proposed 211 service provider to meet the national 211 standards recommended by the Alliance of Information and Referral Systems;

(b)  the financial stability of the proposed 211 service provider;

(c)  the community support for the proposed 211 service provider;

(d)  the relationship between the proposed 211 service provider and other information and referral services; and

(e)  other criteria as the department considers appropriate.

(4)  The department shall coordinate with the approved 211 service provider and:

(a)  other state and local agencies to ensure the joint development and maintenance of a statewide information database for use by the approved 211 service provider; and

(b)  other interested parties, including public, private, and non-profit transportation operators, who shall form a work group and issue a report to the Health and Human Services Interim Committee by November 15, 2013 that addresses the following issues:

(i)  an assessment of transportation needs for individuals with disabilities, the elderly, and other receiving services from the department;

(ii)  an assessment of available services and current transportation providers throughout Utah;

(iii)  identification of opportunities to achieve efficiency in service delivery, including the viability of a single dispatch system; and

(iv)  priorities for implementation of efficiency, based on resources and feasibility.



Enacted by Chapter 24, 2013 General Session

